North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-06 Care and Custody of Dead

23-06-01.
Right to dispose of one’s own body. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 255, § 12.

23-06-01.1.
Immunity from liability. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 5.

23-06-01.2.
Application of other laws.

Sections 23-06-03, 23-06-04, 23-06-05, 23-06-06, 23-06-07, 23-06-08, 23-06-09, 23-06-10, 23-06-11, 23-06-12, 23-06-16, 23-06-17, and 23-06-19 do not apply to any body or parts thereof disposed of after death pursuant to the authorization for disposal of a body or parts thereof provided in and for the purposes of chapter 23-06.6.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 190, § 3; 1969, ch. 255, § 10; 1989, ch. 303, § 1; 2007, ch. 237, § 1.

23-06-02.
Custody of body.

The person charged with the duty of final disposition of the body of a deceased person is entitled to the custody of such body for the purpose of arranging for final disposition. When the coroner is required to hold an inquest, however, the coroner is entitled to the custody of the body until such inquest has been completed.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 357; R.C. 1895, § 7197; R.C. 1899, § 7197; R.C. 1905, § 8932; C.L. 1913, § 9626; R.C. 1943, § 23-0602; 2017, ch. 92, § 7, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Coroner’s disposition of body, autopsy, see N.D.C.C. §§ 11-19.1-10 through 11-19.1-12, 11-19.1-15.

Coroner’s inquest, disposition of property on body, see N.D.C.C. § 11-19.1-15.

Death registration, see N.D.C.C. §§ 23-02.1-19, 23-02.1-20.

Holding of bodies pending investigation, see N.D.C.C. § 11-19.1-10.

23-06-03.
Duty of final disposition — Indigent burial — Decedent’s instructions.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The duty of disposition of the body of a deceased individual devolves upon the following individual in the order of priority:

Any legally competent adult given the duty of final disposition by the deceased individual in a statement conforming with section 23-06-31, except the legally competent adult specified in the statement conforming with section 23-06-31 may decline the duty of final disposition unless the individual would otherwise have the duty of final disposition under this section;

The surviving spouse if the deceased was married;

If the deceased was not married but left kindred, upon the majority of the adult children of the decedent; however, in the absence of actual knowledge to the contrary, a funeral director or mortician may rely on instructions given by the child who represents to be the sole surviving child or the children who represent to constitute a majority of the surviving children;

The surviving parent or parents of the decedent, each having equal authority;

The adult sibling or the majority of the adult siblings of the decedent; however, in the absence of actual knowledge to the contrary, a funeral director or mortician may rely on instructions given by the sibling who represents to be the sole surviving sibling or the siblings who represent to constitute a majority of the surviving siblings;

The adult grandchild or the majority of the adult grandchildren of the decedent; however, in the absence of actual knowledge to the contrary, a funeral director or mortician may rely on instructions given by a grandchild who represents to be the only grandchild reasonably available to control final disposition of the decedent’s remains or the grandchildren who represent to constitute a majority of grandchildren reasonably available to control final disposition of the decedent’s remains;

The grandparent or the grandparents of the decedent, each having equal authority;

The adult nieces and nephews of the decedent or a majority of the adult nieces and nephews; however, in the absence of actual knowledge to the contrary, a funeral director or mortician may rely on instructions given by a niece or nephew, who represents to be the only niece or nephew reasonably available to control final disposition of the decedent’s remains or the nieces and nephews who represent to constitute a majority of the nieces and nephews reasonably available to control final disposition of the decedent’s remains;

An individual who was acting as the guardian of the decedent with authority to make health care decisions for the decedent at the time of death;

An adult who exhibited special care and concern for the decedent;

An individual respectively in the next degree of kinship in the order named by law to inherit the estate of the decedent; or

The appropriate public or court authority, as required by law. For purposes of this subdivision, the appropriate public or court authority includes the human service zone of the county in which the death occurred if the individual dies without apparent financial means to provide for final disposition or the district court in the county in which the death occurred.

If there is only one individual in a degree of relationship to the decedent described in subsection 1, and a district court determines the person and the decedent were estranged at the time of death, the right to control and the duty of disposition devolves to the next degree of relationship under subsection 1. For purposes of this subsection, “estranged” means having a relationship characterized by mutual enmity, hostility, or indifference.

If an individual to whom the right to control and duty of disposition devolves under subsection 1, refuses to accept or declines to act upon the right or duty, that right and duty passes as follows:

To another individual with the same degree of relationship to the decedent as the individual refusing to accept or declining to act; or

To the individual in the next degree of relationship to the decedent under subsection 1.

If a dispute exists regarding the right to control or duty of disposition, the parties in dispute or the mortician or funeral director may file a petition in the district court in the county of residence of the decedent requesting the court make a determination in the matter. If the right to control and duty of disposition devolves to more than one individual with the same degree of relationship to the decedent and those individuals do not, by majority vote, make a decision regarding arrangements and final disposition and a district court has been petitioned to make a determination, the court shall consider the following factors in making a determination:

The reasonableness, practicality, and resources available for payment of the proposed arrangements and final disposition;

The degree of the personal relationship between the decedent and each of the individuals in the same degree of relationship to the decedent;

The expressed wishes and directions of the decedent and the extent to which the decedent provided resources for the purpose of carrying out the wishes or directions; and

The degree to which the arrangements and final disposition will allow for participation by all who wish to pay respect to the decedent.

If the individual who has the duty of final disposition does not arrange for final disposition of the body within the time required by this chapter, the individual next specified shall bury or otherwise dispose of the body within the requirements of this chapter.

If the deceased did not leave sufficient means to pay for expenses of final disposition, including the cost of a casket, and is not survived by an individual described by subsection 1 and identified for financial responsibility within the human service zone’s general assistance policy, within fifteen days of application for services the human service zone of the county in which the deceased had residence for general assistance purposes or, if residence cannot be established, within fifteen days of application for assistance the human service zone of the county in which the death occurs shall employ a person to arrange for and supervise the final disposition. If the deceased was a resident or inmate of a public institution, within fifteen days of application for assistance the human service zone in which the deceased was a resident for general assistance purposes immediately before entering the institution shall employ a person to arrange for and supervise the final disposition.

The department of human services may negotiate with the interested funeral directors or funeral homes regarding cremation expenses and burial expenses but the total charges for burial services, including transportation of the deceased to the place of burial, the grave box or vault, grave space, and grave opening and closing expenses, may not be less than one thousand five hundred dollars.

The department of human services may provide for the use of a military casket or urn, if the deceased was a veteran as defined in section 37-01-40, unless the additional cost exceeds the negotiated expenses of this section or a surviving spouse or the nearest of kin of the deceased elects a nonmilitary casket.

The human service zone shall pay the charge for funeral expenses as negotiated by the department of human services. The human service zone may not decrease the human service zone payment due to a nominal amount left by the deceased or contributed by kin or any other party to defray the expenses of burial or cremation. Funds adequate to allow for burial instead of cremation are considered nominal under this section.

If the individual with the duty of final disposition under this section, or the personal representative of the decedent’s estate, if any, is aware of the decedent’s instructions regarding the disposition of the remains, that person shall honor those instructions, to the extent reasonable and possible, to the extent the instructions do not impose an economic or emotional hardship. A decedent’s instructions may be reflected in a variety of methods, including pre-need funeral arrangements a deceased articulated and funded in a pre-need funeral service contract, a health care directive, a durable power of attorney for health care, a power of attorney, a will, a document created under section 23-06-31, or a document of gift for an anatomical gift.

If the decedent died while serving in any branch of the United States armed forces, the United States reserve forces, or the national guard, as provided by 10 U.S.C. 1481 section (a)(1) through (8) as effective through December 2001, and completed a United States department of defense record of emergency data, DD form 93, or its successor form or its equivalent branch’s form, the duty to bury or cremate the decedent or to provide other funeral and disposition arrangements for the decedent devolves on the person authorized by the decedent pursuant to that form.

A funeral director or mortician has complete authority to control the final disposition and to proceed under this chapter to recover reasonable charges for the final disposition if:

The funeral director or mortician has actual knowledge none of the individuals described in subsection 1 exist, can be found after reasonable inquiry, or can be contacted by reasonable means; and

Within thirty-six hours after having been given written notice of the facts, the appropriate court or public authority fails to assume responsibility for disposition of the remains. Written notice may be delivered by hand, United States mail, or facsimile transmission.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 355; R.C. 1895, § 7195; R.C. 1899, § 7195; R.C. 1905, § 8930; C.L. 1913, § 9624; S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 17; 1943, ch. 107, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0603; S.L. 1947, ch. 198, § 1; 1949, ch. 188, § 1; 1951, ch. 173, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 23-0603; S.L. 1959, ch. 219, § 1; 1969, ch. 253, § 1; 1973, ch. 99, § 2; 1977, ch. 220, § 1; 1979, ch. 312, § 1; 1981, ch. 281, § 1; 1985, ch. 289, § 1; 1989, ch. 304, § 1; 1995, ch. 252, § 1; 1995, ch. 456, § 3; 1997, ch. 226, § 1; 2001, ch. 369, § 1; 2009, ch. 215, § 1; 2011, ch. 186, § 1; 2015, ch. 189, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 92, § 8, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 188, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 207, § 1, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 391, § 17, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross-References.

Burial-transit permit to be obtained, see N.D.C.C. §§ 23-02.1-21, 23-06-07.

Disturbance of dead body an offense, see N.D.C.C. §§ 11-19.1-07.1, 23-06-24, 23-06-27.

Funeral expenses as claim against estate, see N.D.C.C. § 30.1-19-05.

Penal institution inmates, burial of, see N.D.C.C. § 12-45-05.

Workmen’s compensation, burial expenses paid by, see N.D.C.C. § 65-05-26.

23-06-03.
Duty of final disposition — Indigent burial — Decedent’s instructions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The duty of disposition of the body of a deceased individual devolves upon the following individual in the order of priority:

Any legally competent adult given the duty of final disposition by the deceased individual in a statement conforming with section 23-06-31, except the legally competent adult specified in the statement conforming with section 23-06-31 may decline the duty of final disposition unless the individual would otherwise have the duty of final disposition under this section;

The surviving spouse if the deceased was married;

If the deceased was not married but left kindred, upon the majority of the adult children of the decedent; however, in the absence of actual knowledge to the contrary, a funeral director or mortician may rely on instructions given by the child who represents to be the sole surviving child or the children who represent to constitute a majority of the surviving children;

The surviving parent or parents of the decedent, each having equal authority;

The adult sibling or the majority of the adult siblings of the decedent; however, in the absence of actual knowledge to the contrary, a funeral director or mortician may rely on instructions given by the sibling who represents to be the sole surviving sibling or the siblings who represent to constitute a majority of the surviving siblings;

The adult grandchild or the majority of the adult grandchildren of the decedent; however, in the absence of actual knowledge to the contrary, a funeral director or mortician may rely on instructions given by a grandchild who represents to be the only grandchild reasonably available to control final disposition of the decedent’s remains or the grandchildren who represent to constitute a majority of grandchildren reasonably available to control final disposition of the decedent’s remains;

The grandparent or the grandparents of the decedent, each having equal authority;

The adult nieces and nephews of the decedent or a majority of the adult nieces and nephews; however, in the absence of actual knowledge to the contrary, a funeral director or mortician may rely on instructions given by a niece or nephew, who represents to be the only niece or nephew reasonably available to control final disposition of the decedent’s remains or the nieces and nephews who represent to constitute a majority of the nieces and nephews reasonably available to control final disposition of the decedent’s remains;

An individual who was acting as the guardian of the decedent with authority to make health care decisions for the decedent at the time of death;

An adult who exhibited special care and concern for the decedent;

An individual respectively in the next degree of kinship in the order named by law to inherit the estate of the decedent; or

The appropriate public or court authority, as required by law. For purposes of this subdivision, the appropriate public or court authority includes the human service zone of the county in which the death occurred if the individual dies without apparent financial means to provide for final disposition or the district court in the county in which the death occurred.

If there is only one individual in a degree of relationship to the decedent described in subsection 1, and a district court determines the person and the decedent were estranged at the time of death, the right to control and the duty of disposition devolves to the next degree of relationship under subsection 1. For purposes of this subsection, “estranged” means having a relationship characterized by mutual enmity, hostility, or indifference.

If an individual to whom the right to control and duty of disposition devolves under subsection 1, refuses to accept or declines to act upon the right or duty, that right and duty passes as follows:

To another individual with the same degree of relationship to the decedent as the individual refusing to accept or declining to act; or

To the individual in the next degree of relationship to the decedent under subsection 1.

If a dispute exists regarding the right to control or duty of disposition, the parties in dispute or the mortician or funeral director may file a petition in the district court in the county of residence of the decedent requesting the court make a determination in the matter. If the right to control and duty of disposition devolves to more than one individual with the same degree of relationship to the decedent and those individuals do not, by majority vote, make a decision regarding arrangements and final disposition and a district court has been petitioned to make a determination, the court shall consider the following factors in making a determination:

The reasonableness, practicality, and resources available for payment of the proposed arrangements and final disposition;

The degree of the personal relationship between the decedent and each of the individuals in the same degree of relationship to the decedent;

The expressed wishes and directions of the decedent and the extent to which the decedent provided resources for the purpose of carrying out the wishes or directions; and

The degree to which the arrangements and final disposition will allow for participation by all who wish to pay respect to the decedent.

If the individual who has the duty of final disposition does not arrange for final disposition of the body within the time required by this chapter, the individual next specified shall bury or otherwise dispose of the body within the requirements of this chapter.

If the deceased did not leave sufficient means to pay for expenses of final disposition, including the cost of a casket, and is not survived by an individual described by subsection 1 and identified for financial responsibility within the human service zone’s general assistance policy, within fifteen days of application for services the human service zone of the county in which the deceased had residence for general assistance purposes or, if residence cannot be established, within fifteen days of application for assistance the human service zone of the county in which the death occurs shall employ a person to arrange for and supervise the final disposition. If the deceased was a resident or inmate of a public institution, within fifteen days of application for assistance the human service zone in which the deceased was a resident for general assistance purposes immediately before entering the institution shall employ a person to arrange for and supervise the final disposition.

The department of health and human services may negotiate with the interested funeral directors or funeral homes regarding cremation expenses and burial expenses but the total charges for burial services, including transportation of the deceased to the place of burial, the grave box or vault, grave space, and grave opening and closing expenses, may not be less than one thousand five hundred dollars.

The department of health and human services may provide for the use of a military casket or urn, if the deceased was a veteran as defined in section 37-01-40, unless the additional cost exceeds the negotiated expenses of this section or a surviving spouse or the nearest of kin of the deceased elects a nonmilitary casket.

The human service zone shall pay the charge for funeral expenses as negotiated by the department of health and human services. The human service zone may not decrease the human service zone payment due to a nominal amount left by the deceased or contributed by kin or any other party to defray the expenses of burial or cremation. Funds adequate to allow for burial instead of cremation are considered nominal under this section.

If the individual with the duty of final disposition under this section, or the personal representative of the decedent’s estate, if any, is aware of the decedent’s instructions regarding the disposition of the remains, that person shall honor those instructions, to the extent reasonable and possible, to the extent the instructions do not impose an economic or emotional hardship. A decedent’s instructions may be reflected in a variety of methods, including pre-need funeral arrangements a deceased articulated and funded in a pre-need funeral service contract, a health care directive, a durable power of attorney for health care, a power of attorney, a will, a document created under section 23-06-31, or a document of gift for an anatomical gift.

If the decedent died while serving in any branch of the United States armed forces, the United States reserve forces, or the national guard, as provided by 10 U.S.C. 1481 section (a)(1) through (8) as effective through December 2001, and completed a United States department of defense record of emergency data, DD form 93, or its successor form or its equivalent branch’s form, the duty to bury or cremate the decedent or to provide other funeral and disposition arrangements for the decedent devolves on the person authorized by the decedent pursuant to that form.

A funeral director or mortician has complete authority to control the final disposition and to proceed under this chapter to recover reasonable charges for the final disposition if:

The funeral director or mortician has actual knowledge none of the individuals described in subsection 1 exist, can be found after reasonable inquiry, or can be contacted by reasonable means; and

Within thirty-six hours after having been given written notice of the facts, the appropriate court or public authority fails to assume responsibility for disposition of the remains. Written notice may be delivered by hand, United States mail, or facsimile transmission.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 355; R.C. 1895, § 7195; R.C. 1899, § 7195; R.C. 1905, § 8930; C.L. 1913, § 9624; S.L. 1933, ch. 97, § 17; 1943, ch. 107, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 23-0603; S.L. 1947, ch. 198, § 1; 1949, ch. 188, § 1; 1951, ch. 173, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 23-0603; S.L. 1959, ch. 219, § 1; 1969, ch. 253, § 1; 1973, ch. 99, § 2; 1977, ch. 220, § 1; 1979, ch. 312, § 1; 1981, ch. 281, § 1; 1985, ch. 289, § 1; 1989, ch. 304, § 1; 1995, ch. 252, § 1; 1995, ch. 456, § 3; 1997, ch. 226, § 1; 2001, ch. 369, § 1; 2009, ch. 215, § 1; 2011, ch. 186, § 1; 2015, ch. 189, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 92, § 8, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 188, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 207, § 1, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 391, § 17, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 162, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-03.1.
Payments on pre-need funeral contracts to be deposited — Depository shall keep record of deposit — Personal property storage — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 368, § 7.

23-06-04.
Time within which final disposition must be made — Exceptions.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The dead body of a human being must be disposed of by the person charged with that duty within eight days after the death of such person except when any of the following occur:

The right to dissect the body is expressly conferred by law.

The body is being carried through this state.

The body is being removed from this state for the purpose of final disposition in some other state.

A permit is obtained from the local health officer or the state department of health allowing a longer time during which the body need not be disposed. The permit shall state the additional length of time during which the body need not be disposed.

The body is being stored for an extended period of time in a vault determined suitable by the state department of health, but the body may not be stored in a vault for a period of more than eight days during the months of June through October unless a permit is obtained from the local health officer or the state department of health.

The date of final disposition must be the date of the committal service or date of placement in a storage vault or school of medicine.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, §§ 349, 350; S.L. 1893, ch. 90, § 15; R.C. 1895, §§ 269, 7189, 7190; R.C. 1899, §§ 269, 7189, 7190; R.C. 1905, §§ 281, 8924, 8925; C.L. 1913, §§ 427, 9618, 9619; R.C. 1943, § 23-0604; S.L. 1949, ch. 189, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 23-0604; S.L. 1973, ch. 217, § 2; 1983, ch. 290, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2017, ch. 92, § 9, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Removal of body where death caused by contagious disease, see N.D.C.C. § 23-07-15.

23-06-04.
Time within which final disposition must be made — Exceptions.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The dead body of a human being must be disposed of by the person charged with that duty within eight days after the death of such person except when any of the following occur:

The right to dissect the body is expressly conferred by law.

The body is being carried through this state.

The body is being removed from this state for the purpose of final disposition in some other state.

A permit is obtained from the local health officer or the department of health and human services allowing a longer time during which the body need not be disposed. The permit shall state the additional length of time during which the body need not be disposed.

The body is being stored for an extended period of time in a vault determined suitable by the department of health and human services, but the body may not be stored in a vault for a period of more than eight days during the months of June through October unless a permit is obtained from the local health officer or the department of health and human services.

The date of final disposition must be the date of the committal service or date of placement in a storage vault or school of medicine.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, §§ 349, 350; S.L. 1893, ch. 90, § 15; R.C. 1895, §§ 269, 7189, 7190; R.C. 1899, §§ 269, 7189, 7190; R.C. 1905, §§ 281, 8924, 8925; C.L. 1913, §§ 427, 9618, 9619; R.C. 1943, § 23-0604; S.L. 1949, ch. 189, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 23-0604; S.L. 1973, ch. 217, § 2; 1983, ch. 290, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2017, ch. 92, § 9, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 163, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-05.
Failure to dispose within required time — Penalty.

Any person that fails to comply with or who violates any of the provisions of section 23-06-04, or that refuses or neglects promptly to obey any order or instruction of the local board of health, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 356; S.L. 1893, ch. 90, § 20; R.C. 1895, §§ 274, 7196; R.C. 1899, §§ 274, 7196; R.C. 1905, §§ 287, 8931; C.L. 1913, §§ 433, 9625; R.C. 1943, § 23-0605; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 227; 2017, ch. 92, § 10, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class B misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

23-06-06.
Neglect of final disposition — Penalty.

Every person upon which the duty of making final disposition of the remains of a deceased person is imposed by law that omits to perform that duty as required in this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 356; R.C. 1895, § 7196; R.C. 1899, § 7196; R.C. 1905, § 8931; C.L. 1913, § 9625; R.C. 1943, § 23-0606; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 228; 2017, ch. 92, § 11, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class B misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

23-06-07.
Regulation of final disposition — Issuance of final disposition-transit permit regulated.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The body of any individual whose death occurs in this state may not be interred, deposited in a vault or tomb, cremated, donated to a school of medicine, or otherwise disposed as authorized by law, until a final disposition-transit permit has been properly issued by a subregistrar. If the certificate is incorrect or incomplete, the subregistrar may not issue the permit until it is corrected or completed. In the case of any death outside of this state, a final disposition-transit permit issued in accordance with the law and the health regulations in force in the state where the death occurred, when accompanying a body shipped through or into this state, may be accepted with the same effect as a permit from a subregistrar. If the death occurred from some disease that is held to be communicable by the state department of health, the subregistrar shall refuse to issue a permit for the removal or other disposition of the body except under the conditions prescribed by the state department of health and the local board of health.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 270, §§ 6, 19; C.L. 1913, §§ 439, 452; R.C. 1943, § 23-0607; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 25; 2017, ch. 92, § 12, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Death registration, see N.D.C.C. §§ 23-02.1-19, 23-02.1-20.

Permit required, see N.D.C.C. § 23-02.1-21.

Prevention of spread of contagious diseases, duty of board of embalmers, see N.D.C.C. § 43-10-06.

Removal of body where death caused by contagious disease, see N.D.C.C. § 23-07-15.

23-06-07.
Regulation of final disposition — Issuance of final disposition-transit permit regulated.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The body of any individual whose death occurs in this state may not be interred, deposited in a vault or tomb, cremated, donated to a school of medicine, or otherwise disposed as authorized by law, until a final disposition-transit permit has been properly issued by a subregistrar. If the certificate is incorrect or incomplete, the subregistrar may not issue the permit until it is corrected or completed. In the case of any death outside of this state, a final disposition-transit permit issued in accordance with the law and the health regulations in force in the state where the death occurred, when accompanying a body shipped through or into this state, may be accepted with the same effect as a permit from a subregistrar. If the death occurred from some disease that is held to be communicable by the department of health and human services, the subregistrar shall refuse to issue a permit for the removal or other disposition of the body except under the conditions prescribed by the department of health and human services and the local board of health.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 270, §§ 6, 19; C.L. 1913, §§ 439, 452; R.C. 1943, § 23-0607; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 25; 2017, ch. 92, § 12, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 164, effective September 1, 2022.

23-06-08.
Final disposition-transit permit — Contents.

The final disposition-transit permit must be on the form prescribed by the state registrar of vital statistics, must be signed by the subregistrar issuing it, and may be limited to a statement by the subregistrar showing:

That a satisfactory death record has been filed with the state registrar as required by law.

That permission is granted to inter, remove, or otherwise dispose of as authorized by law the body of the deceased.

The name, age, and sex of the deceased and any other necessary details.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 270, § 11; C.L. 1913, § 444; R.C. 1943, § 23-0608; 2007, ch. 234, § 26; 2017, ch. 92, § 13, effective August 1, 2017.

23-06-09.
Disposition of final disposition-transit permit.

The funeral practitioner, or individual acting as funeral practitioner, shall secure the final disposition-transit permit from the subregistrar. The funeral practitioner, or person acting as funeral practitioner, shall deliver such permit to the sexton or person in charge of the place of final disposition before interring the body, cremating the body, donating the body to a medical school, or otherwise disposing of the body as authorized by law, or shall attach it to the box containing the corpse when the same is shipped by any transportation company. Such permit must be accepted by the sexton or person in charge as authority for the final disposition of the body. A body may not be accepted for carriage by a common carrier unless the permit is attached as required in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 270, § 10; C.L. 1913, § 443; R.C. 1943, § 23-0609; 2007, ch. 234, § 27; 2017, ch. 92, § 14, effective August 1, 2017.

Collateral References.

Civil liability of undertakers in connection with transportation, burial, or safeguarding of a body, 53 A.L.R.4th 360.

23-06-10.
Sextons to endorse and return final disposition-transit permit — Record of burials.

Each sexton or person in charge of the burial ground shall endorse the date of interment upon the final disposition-transit permit over the person’s signature, and return the final disposition-transit permit to the county recorder. The subregistrar or sexton shall file all completed permits, so endorsed, with the county recorder within ten days after the date of interment or within the time prescribed by the local board of health.

The sexton shall keep a record of all interments made in the premises under the sexton’s charge, stating the name of the deceased individual, the place of death, the date of burial, and the name and address of the funeral practitioner. Such record at all times must be open to public inspection.

In the absence of a sexton, the funeral director making the burial shall endorse and return the final disposition-transit permit to the subregistrar.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 270, § 12; C.L. 1913, § 445; R.C. 1943, § 23-0610; S.L. 1973, ch. 217, § 3; 2007, ch. 234, § 28; 2017, ch. 92, § 15, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Additional duties of sexton, see N.D.C.C. § 23-06-22.

23-06-11.
Burial without final disposition-transit permit — Penalty.

It is unlawful for a person, acting as a funeral practitioner, to inter, remove, or otherwise dispose of as authorized by law the body of any deceased individual without having received a final disposition-transit permit.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 270, § 22; C.L. 1913, § 455; R.C. 1943, § 23-0611; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 229; 2017, ch. 92, § 16, effective August 1, 2017.

23-06-12.
Transporting body without final disposition-transit permit.

It is unlawful for a transportation company or common carrier to transport, or accept for transportation, the body of any deceased individual unless that body is accompanied by a final disposition-transit permit issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 270, § 22; C.L. 1913, § 455; R.C. 1943, § 23-0612; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 230; 2017, ch. 92, § 17, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Removal of body where death caused by contagious disease, see N.D.C.C. § 23-07-15.

23-06-13.
Dissection — When allowed.

The dead body of a human being may be dissected:

When the death occurs under circumstances in which a coroner is authorized by law to hold an inquest upon the body, and a coroner authorizes such dissection for the purposes of the inquest;

If the spouse, or one of the next of kin of a deceased individual, charged by law with the duty of final disposition, authorizes such dissection for the purposes of ascertaining the cause of death; or

When permission has been given therefor by deceased.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 351; R.C. 1895, § 7191; R.C. 1899, § 7191; R.C. 1905, § 8926; C.L. 1913, § 9620; R.C. 1943, § 23-0613; S.L. 1969, ch. 254, § 1; 1987, ch. 259, § 7; 2017, ch. 92, § 18, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Inquests, see N.D.C.C. §§ 11-19.1-11, 12-45-01.

Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-06.6.

Collateral References.

Power of court to order disinterment and autopsy or examination for evidential purposes in civil case, 21 A.L.R.2d 538.

Insurer’s right to exhumation of body for purpose of autopsy, 30 A.L.R.2d 837.

Liability for wrongful autopsy, 18 A.L.R.4th 858.

Civil liability of undertaker for acts or omissions relating to autopsies, 5 A.L.R. Fed. 625.

Civil liability in conjunction with autopsy, 97 A.L.R.5th 419.

23-06-14.
What bodies may be used for dissection.

Any medical association, licensed physician and surgeon, or medical school, upon request, may receive and remove free of charge the bodies of the following deceased persons, if such bodies are to be used within the state for the advancement of anatomical knowledge and medical science and if proper notice is given to the relatives or guardian of the deceased:

A person executed pursuant to sentence of law.

A person dying in the penitentiary or county jail while under sentence for a crime.

A person required to be buried at public expense.

Preference must be given to medical schools, and such schools shall furnish the bodies to the students of medicine and surgery.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 92, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 281; R.C. 1899, § 281; S.L. 1905, ch. 134, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 300, 2079; C.L. 1913, §§ 472, 2809; R.C. 1943, § 23-0614.

23-06-15.
When body not to be used for dissection.

If a person mentioned in section 23-06-14 has requested, during that person’s last illness, that that person be buried, that person’s body may not be surrendered for dissection but must be buried. If any friend, relative, or guardian of any such person requests, within thirty-six hours after that person’s death, that the body be turned over to such friend, relative, or guardian for interment, such request must be complied with.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 92, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 283; R.C. 1899, § 283; S.L. 1905, ch. 134, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 302, 2079; C.L. 1913, §§ 474, 2809; R.C. 1943, § 23-0615.

23-06-16.
Bond given by person receiving body.

Every physician or surgeon and every medical school, before receiving any dead body, shall give to the officer surrendering the same a sufficient bond conditioned that the body shall be used only for the promotion of anatomical science and medical knowledge within this state and so as not to outrage public feeling, and that after having been so used, the remains thereof shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of section 23-06-17.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 92, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 282; R.C. 1899, § 282; S.L. 1905, ch. 134, § 2; R.C. 1905, §§ 301, 2080; C.L. 1913, §§ 473, 2810; R.C. 1943, § 23-0616.

23-06-17.
Bodies required to be buried or cremated after being dissected.

Any person who receives for dissection any dead body, in pursuance of the provisions of this chapter, shall decently bury the body in some public cemetery or shall cremate the same in a furnace properly constructed for that purpose after the dissection has been made.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 353; R.C. 1895, § 7193; R.C. 1899, § 7193; S.L. 1905, ch. 134, § 3; R.C. 1905, §§ 2081, 8928; C.L. 1913, §§ 2811, 9622; R.C. 1943, § 23-0617; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 231.

23-06-18.
Dissection — Removal of body — Sale — Penalty.

Any person who receives a body for use under the provisions of section 23-06-14 and uses the same for any other purpose, or who removes the same beyond the limits of this state, or who buys or sells any such body, or traffics in the same, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. It is unlawful for an officer to refuse to deliver the remains or body of any deceased person, when demanded under the provisions of section 23-06-14.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 134, § 2; R.C. 1905, § 2080; C.L. 1913, § 2810; R.C. 1943, § 23-0618; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 232.